Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.260

Guidelines.

(1) The department of health shall convene a stakeholder group including the department of social and health services, the department of transportation, and local special needs transportation providers who shall assist in the development of guidelines for the safe transport of individuals who rely on stretchers and personal mobility devices.

(2) The department of health shall prepare guidelines for the public and vehicle operators relating to:

(a) Appropriate situations in which vehicles other than ambulances may be used to transport individuals who rely upon personal mobility aids in the normal course of their lives; and

(b) Methods for properly securing personal mobility aids on vehicles other than ambulances and determining if they are adequately secured.

[ 2007 c 305 s 2.]